Massachusetts, session 194th, S1578.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 Official 
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 24O the following section:-  
Section 24P. (a) The department, subject to appropriation, shall develop and implement 
an evidence-based culturally-specific patient navigation pilot program for people living with a 
Long COVID diagnosis, aligned with the National Academies of Sciences, Engineering, and 
Medicine (NASEM) Long COVID definition.   
(b) The department shall design the pilot program to: (i) reduce barriers for Long COVID 
patients in accessing timely and knowledgeable medical treatment, (ii) provide referrals for 
clinical care and nonclinical support to patients with Long COVID and their families, (iii) 
facilitate access to medical information and resources to help meet daily needs and emotional 
support, and (iv) integrate within healthcare teams for maximum efficacy.   

of 3 12  (c) The department shall develop guidelines to standardize Long COVID patient 
navigator care, which could include appropriate training to ensure skills and knowledge needed 
to deliver the proposed service.  
(d) The pilot program shall include, but not be limited to, the following activities:  
(i) collecting and sharing data;  
(ii) making initial contact with patients, conducting social and medical needs 
assessments;  
(iii) providing navigation on clinical needs including assistance for patients with Long 
COVID to identify appropriate subspecialty care, making referrals and connections to clinicians, 
facilitating communication among providers and with the patient’s health care team, scheduling 
medical appointments, and optimizing insurance coverage and disability insurance coverage;  
(iv) providing navigation on social and emotional support needs including providing 
connections for patients with Long COVID to lay support group services in order to address 
stress for patients with long COVID and to social services in order to address issues that include 
transportation, language barriers and interpretation, food insecurity, housing insecurity, 
unemployment assistance, connections to community-based organizations and other services;   
(v) providing resources to inform shared decision-making and the availability of social 
and community services;  
(vi) establishing reimbursement for patient navigator services and supervision of such 
services  

of 3 32  (e) Not later than one year after the implementation of the pilot program said department 
shall provide a report to the clerks of the house and the senate and to the joint committees on 
public health and health care financing. The report shall include, but not be limited to; (i) the 
activities of the pilot, including services provided, the geographical locations of services, (ii) the 
number of patients who participated and the region where they live, and (iii) the advisability of 
expanding the pilot program.